Washington statutes.
RCW 11.90.240

Exclusive jurisdiction for court appointing a guardian or issuing a protective order.

Except as otherwise provided in RCW 11.90.230, a court that has appointed a guardian or issued a protective order consistent with this chapter has exclusive and continuing jurisdiction over the proceeding until it is terminated by the court or the appointment or order expires by its own terms.

[ 2009 c 81 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 81: See note following RCW 11.90.010.